Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-128
Officers and employees; bond or insurance.

Each official and employee who is given the custody of funds or property of the state shall be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201.

Laws 1913, c. 179, § 15, p. 541;

R.S.1913, § 7193;

C.S.1922, § 6844;

C.S.1929, § 83-115;

Laws 1941, c. 186, § 1, p. 754;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 83-115;

R.S.1943, § 83-128;

Laws 1978, LB 653, § 36;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 45.